California statutes. Corporations Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 453, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

9246.

(a) For the purposes of this section, “agent” means any person who is or was a director, officer, employee or other agent of the corporation, or is or was serving at the request of the corporation as a director, officer, employee, or agent of another foreign or domestic corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise, or was a director, officer, employee, or agent of a foreign or domestic corporation which was a predecessor corporation of the corporation or of another enterprise at the request of that predecessor corporation; “proceeding” means any threatened,
 pending, or completed action or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative or investigative; and “expenses” includes without limitation attorneys’ fees and any expenses of establishing a right to indemnification under subdivision (d) or paragraph (3) of subdivision (e).

(b) A corporation shall have power to indemnify any person who was or is a party or is threatened to be made a party to any proceeding (other than an action by or in the right of the corporation to procure a judgment in its favor, an action brought under Section 9243, or an action brought by the Attorney General pursuant to Section 9230) by reason of the fact that the person is or was an agent of the corporation, against expenses, judgments, fines, settlements and other
 amounts actually and reasonably incurred in connection with
 the proceeding if
 the person acted in good faith and in a manner the person believed to be in the best interests of the corporation and, in the case of a criminal proceeding, had no reasonable cause to believe the conduct of the person was unlawful. The termination of any proceeding by judgment, order, settlement, conviction or upon a plea of nolo contendere or its equivalent shall not, of itself, create a presumption that the person did not act in good faith and in a manner which the person believed to be in the best interests of the corporation or that the person had reasonable cause to believe that
 the person’s conduct was unlawful.

(c) A corporation shall have power to indemnify any person who was or is a party or is threatened to be made a party to any threatened, pending or completed action by or in the right of the corporation, or brought under Section 9243, or brought by the Attorney General pursuant to Section 9230, to procure a judgment in its favor by reason of the fact that the person is or was an agent of the corporation, against expenses actually and reasonably incurred by the person in connection with the defense or settlement of
 the action if the person acted in good faith, in a manner in which
 the person believed to be in the best interests of the corporation and with that care, including reasonable inquiry, as an ordinary prudent person in a like position would use under similar circumstances. No indemnification shall be made under this subdivision:

(1) In respect of any claim, issue, or matter as to which the
 person shall have been adjudged to be liable to the corporation in the performance of the person’s duty to the corporation, unless and only to the extent that the court in which
 the proceeding is or was pending shall determine upon application that, in view of all the circumstances of the case, the person is fairly and reasonably entitled to indemnity for the expenses which the court shall determine;

(2) Of amounts paid in settling or otherwise disposing of a threatened or pending action, with or without court approval; or

(3) Of expenses incurred in defending a threatened or pending action which is settled or otherwise disposed
 of without court approval unless it is settled with the approval of the Attorney General.

(d) To the extent that an agent of a corporation has been successful on the merits in defense of any proceeding referred to in subdivision (b) or (c) or in defense of any claim, issue or matter therein, the agent shall be indemnified against expenses actually and reasonably incurred by the agent in connection therewith.

(e) Except as provided in subdivision (d), any indemnification under this section shall be made by the corporation only if authorized in the specific case, upon a determination that indemnification of the agent is proper in the circumstances because the agent has met the applicable standard of conduct set forth in either subdivision (b) or (c) by:

(1) A majority vote of a quorum consisting of directors who are
 not parties to the
 proceeding;

(2) Approval of the members (Section 5034), with the persons to be indemnified not being entitled to vote thereon; or

(3) The court in which the proceeding is or was pending upon application made by the corporation or the agent or the attorney or other person rendering services in connection with the defense, whether or not the application by the agent, attorney,
 or other person is opposed by the corporation.

(f) Expenses incurred in defending any proceeding may be advanced by the corporation prior to the final disposition of the proceeding upon receipt of an undertaking by or on behalf of the agent to repay the amount unless it shall be determined ultimately that the agent is entitled to be indemnified as authorized in this section.

(g) No provision made by a corporation to indemnify its or its
 subsidiary’s directors or officers for the defense of any proceeding, whether contained in the articles, bylaws, a resolution of members or directors, an agreement or otherwise, shall be valid unless consistent with this section. Nothing contained in this section shall affect any right to indemnification to which persons other than the directors and officers may be entitled by contract or otherwise.

(h) No indemnification or advance shall be made under this section, except as provided in subdivision (d) or paragraph (3) of subdivision (e), in any circumstance where it appears that:

(1) It would be inconsistent with a provision of the articles,
 bylaws, a resolution of the members or an agreement in effect at the time of the accrual of the alleged cause of action asserted in the proceeding in which the expenses were incurred or other amounts were paid, which prohibits or otherwise limits indemnification; or

(2) It would be inconsistent with any condition expressly imposed by a court in approving a settlement.

(i) A corporation shall have power to purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any agent of the corporation against any liability asserted against or incurred by the agent in that capacity or arising out of the agent’s status as such whether or not the corporation would have the power to indemnify the agent against
 that liability under the provisions of this section; provided, however, that a corporation shall have no power to purchase and maintain insurance to indemnify any agent of the corporation for a violation of Section 9243.

(j) This section does not apply to any proceeding against any trustee, investment manager, or other fiduciary of a pension, deferred compensation, saving, thrift, or other retirement, incentive, or benefit plan, trust, or provision for any or all of the corporation’s directors, officers, employees, and
 persons providing services to the corporation or any of its subsidiary or related or affiliated corporations,
 in the person’s capacity as such, even though the
 person may also be an agent as defined in subdivision (a) of the employer corporation. A corporation shall have power to indemnify the trustee, investment manager or other fiduciary to the extent permitted by subdivision (f) of Section 9140.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 61, Sec. 3.   (AB 2668)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

9247.

(a) There shall be no personal liability for monetary damages to a third party on the part of a volunteer director or volunteer executive officer of a nonprofit corporation subject to this part, caused by the director’s or officer’s negligent act or omission in the performance of that person’s duties as a director or officer, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The act or omission was within the scope of the director’s or executive officer’s duties.

(2) The act or omission was performed in good faith.

(3) The act or omission was not reckless, wanton, intentional, or grossly negligent.

(4) Damages caused by the act or omission are covered pursuant to a liability insurance policy issued to the corporation, either in the form of a general liability policy or a director’s or officer’s liability policy, or personally to the director or executive officer. In the event that the damages are not covered by a liability insurance policy, the volunteer director or volunteer executive officer shall not be personally liable for the damages if the board of directors of the corporation and the person had made all reasonable efforts in good faith to obtain available liability insurance.

(b) “Volunteer” means the rendering of services without compensation. “Compensation” means remuneration whether by way of salary, fee, or other consideration for services rendered. However, the payment of per diem, mileage, or other reimbursement expenses to a director or executive officer does not affect that person’s status as a volunteer within the meaning of this section.

(c) “Executive officer” means the president, vice president, secretary, or treasurer of a corporation, or other individual serving in like capacity, who assists in establishing the policy of the corporation.

(d) Nothing in this section shall limit the liability of the corporation for any damages caused by acts or omissions of the volunteer director or volunteer executive officer.

(e) This section does not eliminate or limit the liability of a director or officer for any of the following:

(1) As provided in Section 9243 or 9245.

(2) In any action or proceeding brought by the Attorney General.

(f) Nothing in this section creates a duty of care or basis of liability for damage or injury caused by the acts or omissions of a director or officer.

(g) This section is only applicable to causes of action based upon acts or omissions occurring on or after January 1, 1988.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 107, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Investments [9250. - 9251.]

9250.

(a) In investing, reinvesting, purchasing, acquiring, exchanging, selling, and managing a corporation’s investments, the board shall meet the standards set forth in Section 9241.

(b) Compliance with the Uniform Prudent Management of Institutional Funds Act (Part 7 (commencing with Section 18501) of Division 9 of the Probate Code), if that act would be applicable, will be deemed to be compliance with subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 56, Sec. 2.   (AB 792)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

9251.

Nothing in Section 9250 shall abrogate or restrict the power of a court in proper cases to direct or permit a corporation to deviate from the terms of a trust or agreement regarding the making or retention of investments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Compliance with Internal Revenue Code [9260. - 9260.]

9260.

Notwithstanding any other law, every corporation, during any period or periods that corporation is deemed to be a “private foundation” as defined in Section 509 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, shall be subject to the requirements of Section 5260.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 516, Sec. 2.   (SB 363)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Members [9310. - 9353.]



  ARTICLE 1. Issuance of Memberships [9310. - 9313.]

9310.

(a) A corporation may admit persons to membership, as provided in its articles or bylaws, or may provide in its articles or bylaws that it shall have no members. In the absence of any provision in its articles or bylaws providing for members, a corporation shall have no members.

(b) Subject to the articles or bylaws, in the case of a corporation which has no members:

(1) Any action for which there is no specific provision of this part applicable to a corporation which has no members and which would otherwise require approval by a majority of all members (Section 5033) or approval by the members (Section 5034) shall require only approval of the board.

(2) All rights which would otherwise vest under this part in the members shall vest in the directors.

(c) Reference in this part to a corporation which has no members includes a corporation in which the directors are the only members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 812, Sec. 14.5.)
-------------------------------------------

9311.

Subject to the articles or bylaws, memberships may be issued by a corporation for no consideration or for such consideration as is determined by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

9312.

No person may hold more than one membership, and no fractional memberships may be held, provided, however, that:

(a) Two or more persons may have an indivisible interest in a single membership when authorized by, and in such manner or under the circumstances prescribed by, the articles or bylaws; and

(b) If the articles or bylaws provide for classes of membership in which the differences are not merely the number of votes entitled to be cast by members of the class, and if the articles or bylaws permit a person to be a member of more than one class, a person may hold a membership in one or more classes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

9313.

Except as provided in its articles or bylaws, a corporation may admit any person to membership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Transfer of Memberships [9320. - 9320.]

9320.

Subject to Section 9417:

(a) No member may transfer for value a membership or any right arising therefrom; and

(b) Unless otherwise provided in the corporation’s articles or bylaws, all rights of membership cease upon the member’s death or dissolution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 587, Sec. 50.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Types of Memberships [9330. - 9332.]

9330.

A corporation may issue memberships having different rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions, or conditions, as authorized by its articles or bylaws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

9331.

Except as provided in or authorized by the articles or bylaws, all memberships shall have the same rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions, and conditions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

9332.

(a) A corporation may refer to persons associated with it as “members” even though such persons are not members within the meaning of Section 5056; but references to members in this part mean members as defined in Section 5056. 

(b) A corporation may benefit, serve, or assist persons who are not members within the meaning of Section 5056 for such consideration, if any, as the board may determine or as is authorized or provided for in the articles or bylaws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Termination of Memberships [9340. - 9340.]

9340.

(a) A member may resign from membership at any time.

(b) This section shall not relieve the resigning member from any obligation for charges incurred, services or benefits actually rendered, dues, assessments or fees, or arising from contract or otherwise, and this section shall not diminish any right of the corporation to enforce any such obligation or obtain damages for its breach.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 9320 or in subdivision (a) of this section, a membership issued for a period of time shall expire when such period of time has elapsed unless the membership is renewed.

(d) A membership may be terminated as provided in the articles or bylaws of the corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Rights and Obligations of Members and Creditors [9350. - 9353.]

9350.

(a) A member of a corporation is not, as such, personally liable for the debts, liabilities, or obligations of the corporation.

(b) No person is liable for any obligation arising from membership unless the person was admitted to membership upon the person’s application or with the person’s consent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

9351.

A corporation may levy dues, assessments, or fees upon its members pursuant to its articles or bylaws, but a member upon learning of them may avoid liability for them by promptly resigning from membership, except where the member is, by contract or otherwise, liable for them. Article or bylaw provisions authorizing such dues, assessments, or fees do not, of themselves, create such liability.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

9352.

(a) No action shall be brought by or on behalf of any creditor to reach and apply the liability, if any, of a member to the corporation to pay any amount due to the corporation unless final judgment has been rendered in favor of the creditor against the corporation and execution has been returned unsatisfied in whole or in part or unless such proceedings would be useless.

(b) All creditors of the corporation, with or without reducing their claims to judgment, may intervene in any such creditor’s action to reach and apply unpaid amounts due the corporation and any or all members who owe amounts to the corporation may be joined in such action. Several judgments may be rendered for and against the parties to the action or in favor of a receiver for the benefit of the respective parties thereto.

(c) All amounts paid by any member in any such action shall be credited on the unpaid balance due the corporation by such member.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

9353.

Nothing in this part shall be construed as in derogation of any rights or remedies which any creditor or member may have against any promoter, member, director, officer or the corporation because of participation in any fraud or illegality practiced upon such creditor or member by any such person or by the corporation in connection with the issue or sale of memberships or securities or in derogation of any rights which the corporation may have by rescission, cancellation or otherwise because of any fraud or illegality practiced on it by any such person in connection with the issue or sale of memberships or securities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Meetings and Voting [9410. - 9421.]

9410.

(a) In the absence of a contrary provision in the articles or bylaws, the provisions of this chapter shall apply to any regular or special meeting of members or obtaining approval of members (Section 5034) or approval of a majority of members (Section 5033). The articles or bylaws may provide any reasonable method of calling, noticing, and holding such meetings or obtaining such approvals.

(b) Anything in subdivision (a) to the contrary notwithstanding, the articles or bylaws may not vary the provisions of subdivision (e) of Section 9411, subdivision (e) of Section 9417 (if proxies are authorized), or Section 9418.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 587, Sec. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

9411.

(a) Subject to the provisions of this chapter, regular and special meetings of members shall be called, noticed, and held as may be ordered by the board. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the notice of a members’ meeting or any report may be sent by electronic communication or other means of remote communication if the board determines it is necessary or appropriate because of an emergency, as defined in paragraph (5) of subdivision (n) of Section 9140. Subject to any limitations in the articles or bylaws of the corporation, if authorized by the board of directors in its sole discretion, and subject to those guidelines and procedures as the board of directors may adopt, members not physically present in person (or, if proxies are allowed, by proxy) at a meeting of members may, by electronic transmission by and to the corporation
 (Sections 20 and 21), electronic video screen communication, conference telephone, or other means of remote communication, participate in a meeting of members, be deemed present in person (or, if proxies are allowed, by proxy), and vote at a meeting of members, subject to subdivision (f).

(b) Special meetings of members for any lawful purpose may be called by the board or the chairperson of the board or the president. In addition, special meetings of members for any lawful purpose may be called by 5 percent or more of the members.

(c) Upon request in writing to the chairperson of the board, president, vice president, or secretary by any person (other than the board) entitled to call a special meeting of members, the board shall expeditiously set a reasonable time and place for the meeting and the officer forthwith shall cause notice to be given to the members entitled to vote of
 the time and place of the meeting. If the notice is not given within 20 days after receipt of the request, the persons entitled to call the meeting may give the notice or the superior court of the proper county shall summarily order the giving of the notice, after notice to the corporation giving it an opportunity to be heard. The court may issue such orders as may be appropriate, including, without limitation, orders designating the time and place of the meeting, the record date for determination of members entitled to vote, and the form of notice.

(d) The transactions of any meeting of members, however called and noticed, and wherever held, are as valid as though had at a meeting duly held after regular call and notice, if a quorum is present either in person (or, if proxies are allowed, by proxy), and if, either before or after the meeting, each of the persons entitled to vote, not present in person or by proxy, signs a written waiver of
 notice or a consent to the holding of the meeting or an approval of the minutes thereof. All such waivers, consents, and approvals shall be filed with the corporate records or made a part of the minutes of the meeting. Attendance of a person at a meeting shall constitute a waiver of notice of and presence at such meeting, except when the person objects, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened and except that attendance at a meeting is not a waiver of any right to object to the consideration of matters required by this part to be included in the notice but not so included, if such objection is expressly made at the meeting. Neither the business to be transacted at nor the purpose of any regular or special meeting of members need be specified in any written waiver of notice, consent to the holding of the meeting, or approval of the minutes thereof except as provided in subdivision (e).

(e) Any member approval required under subdivision (b) of Section 9150, Section 9222, Section 5812 (made applicable pursuant to Section 9620), subdivision (a) of Section 9631, subdivision (c) of Section 9640, subdivision (a) of Section 6015 (made applicable pursuant to Section 9640), or subdivision (b) of Section 9680, other than unanimous approval by those entitled to vote, shall be valid only if the general nature of the proposal so approved was stated in the notice of meeting or in any written waiver of notice.

(f) A meeting of the members may be conducted, in whole or in part, by electronic transmission by and to the corporation or by electronic video screen communication, conference telephone, or other means of remote communication if the corporation implements reasonable measures: (1) to provide members and proxyholders (if proxies are allowed) a reasonable opportunity to
 participate in the meeting and to vote on matters submitted to the members, including an opportunity to read or hear the proceedings of the meeting concurrently with those proceedings, (2) if any member or proxyholder (if proxies are allowed) votes or takes other action at the meeting by means of electronic transmission to the corporation, electronic video screen communication, conference telephone, or other means of remote communication, to maintain a record of that vote or action in its books and records, and (3) to verify that each person who has voted remotely is a member or proxyholder (if proxies are allowed). A corporation shall not conduct a meeting of members solely by electronic transmission by and to the corporation, electronic video screen communication, conference telephone, or other means of remote communication unless one or more of the following conditions apply: (A) all of the members consent; (B) the board determines it is necessary or appropriate because of an emergency, as defined in
 paragraph (5) of subdivision (n) of Section 9140; or (C) notwithstanding the absence of consent from all members pursuant to (A) or subdivision (b) of Section 20, the meeting includes a live audiovisual feed for the duration of the meeting. A corporation holding a meeting pursuant to (C) may offer, in addition to remote audiovisual feed, an audio-only means by which a member or proxyholder may participate provided that the choice between participating via audiovisual or via audio-only means is made by the member or proxyholder and the corporation does not impose any barriers to either mode of participation. A de minimis disruption of an audio or audiovisual feed does not require a corporation to end a meeting under, or render the corporation out of compliance with, this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 157, Sec. 4.   (AB 2908)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9412.

(a) One-third of the voting power, represented in person, by written ballot, or by proxy, shall constitute a quorum at a meeting of members. If a quorum is present, the affirmative vote of the majority of the voting power represented at the meeting, entitled to vote, and voting on any matter shall be the act of the members.

(b) The members present at a duly called or held meeting at which a quorum is present may continue to transact business until adjournment notwithstanding the withdrawal of enough members to leave less than a quorum, if any action taken (other than adjournment) is approved by at least a majority of the members required to constitute a quorum or, if required by this division, or by the articles or the bylaws, the vote of the greater number or voting by classes.

(c) In the absence of a quorum, any meeting of members may be adjourned from time to time by the vote of a majority of the votes represented either in person or by proxy, but no other business may be transacted, except as provided in subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 485, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

9413.

(a) Any action which may be taken at any regular or special meeting of members may be taken without a meeting if the written ballot of every member is solicited, if the required number of signed approvals in writing, setting forth the action so taken, is received, and if the requirements of subdivision (c) are satisfied. Unless otherwise provided by the articles or bylaws and if approved by the board of directors, that ballot and any related material may be sent by electronic transmission by the corporation (Section 20) and responses may be returned to the corporation by electronic transmission to the corporation (Section 21).

(b) All solicitations of ballots shall indicate the time by which the ballot must be returned to be counted.

(c) Approval by written ballot pursuant to this section shall be valid only when the number of ballots cast on or before the time the ballot must be returned to be counted equals or exceeds the quorum required to be present at a meeting authorizing the action, and the number of approvals equals or exceeds the number of votes that would be required to approve at a meeting at which the total number of votes cast was the same as the number of ballots cast.

(d) A written ballot may not be revoked.

(e) Directors may be elected by written ballot under this section, where authorized by the articles or bylaws, except that election by written ballot may not be authorized where the directors are elected by cumulative voting pursuant to Section 9415.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 254, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

9414.

(a) If for any reason it is impractical or unduly difficult for any corporation to call or conduct a meeting of its members, delegates or directors, or otherwise obtain their consent, in the manner prescribed by its articles or bylaws, or this part, then the superior court of the proper county, upon petition of a director, officer, delegate, or member, may order that such a meeting be called or that a written ballot or other form of obtaining the vote of members, delegates or directors be authorized, in such a manner as the court finds fair and equitable under the circumstances.

(b) The court shall, in an order issued pursuant to this section, provide for a method of notice reasonably designed to give actual notice to all parties who would be entitled to notice of a meeting held pursuant to the articles, bylaws and this part, whether or not the method results in actual notice to every such person, or conforms to the notice requirements that would otherwise apply. In a proceeding under this section the court may determine who the members or directors are.

(c) The order issued pursuant to this section may dispense with any requirement relating to the holding of and voting at meetings or obtaining of votes, including any requirement as to quorums or as to the number or percentage of votes needed for approval, that would otherwise be imposed by the articles, bylaws, or this part.

(d) Wherever practical any order issued pursuant to this section shall limit the subject matter of the meetings or other forms of consent authorized to items, including amendments to the articles or bylaws, the resolution of which will or may enable the corporation to continue managing its affairs without further resort to this section; provided, however, that an order under this section may also authorize the obtaining of whatever votes and approvals are necessary for the dissolution, merger, sale of assets or reorganization of the corporation.

(e) Any meeting or other method of obtaining the vote of members, delegates or directors conducted pursuant to an order issued under this section, and which complies with all the provisions of such order, is for all purposes a valid meeting or vote, as the case may be, and shall have the same force and effect as if it complied with every requirement imposed by the articles, bylaws and this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 766, Sec. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

9415.

(a) If the articles or bylaws authorize cumulative voting, but not otherwise, every member entitled to vote at any election of directors may cumulate such member’s votes and give one candidate a number of votes equal to the number of directors to be elected multiplied by the number of votes to which the member is entitled, or distribute the member’s votes on the same principle among as many candidates as the member thinks fit.

(b) No member shall be entitled to cumulate votes for a candidate or candidates unless such candidate’s name or candidates’ names have been placed in nomination prior to the voting and the member has given notice at the meeting prior to the voting of the member’s intention to cumulate votes. If any one member has given such notice, all members may cumulate their votes for candidates in nomination.

(c) In any election of directors, the candidates receiving the highest number of votes are elected, subject to any lawful provision specifying election by classes.

(d) Elections for directors need not be by ballot unless a member demands election by ballot at the meeting and before the voting begins or unless the bylaws so require.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 570, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

9417.

(a) Any member may authorize another person or persons to act by proxy with respect to such membership, except that this right may be limited or withdrawn by the articles or bylaws. Any proxy purported to be executed in accordance with the provisions of this part shall be presumptively valid.

(b) No proxy shall be valid after the expiration of 11 months from the date thereof unless otherwise provided in the proxy, except that the maximum term of any proxy shall be three years from the date of execution. Every proxy continues in full force and effect until revoked by the person executing it prior to the vote pursuant thereto. Such revocation may be effected by a writing delivered to the corporation stating that the proxy is revoked or by a subsequent proxy executed by the person executing the prior proxy and presented to the meeting, or as to any meeting by attendance at such meeting and voting in person by the person executing the proxy.

(c) A proxy is not revoked by the death or incapacity of the maker or the termination of a membership as a result thereof unless, before the vote is counted, written notice of such death or incapacity is received by the corporation.

(d) The proxy of a member may not be irrevocable.

(e) Any proxy covering matters requiring a vote of the members pursuant to Section 5812 (made applicable pursuant to Section 9620), subdivision (a) of Section 9631, subdivision (c) of Section 9640, subdivision (a) of Section 6015 (made applicable pursuant to Section 9640), or subdivision (b) of Section 9680 is not valid unless it sets forth the general nature of the matter to be voted on.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 587, Sec. 53.)
-------------------------------------------

9418.

(a) Upon the filing of an action therefor by any director or member, or by any person who had the right to vote in the election at issue after such director, member, or person has exhausted any remedies provided in the articles or bylaws, the superior court of the proper county shall determine the validity of any election or appointment of any director of any corporation.

(b) Upon the filing of the complaint, and before any further proceedings are had, the court shall enter an order fixing a date for the hearing, which shall be within five days unless for good cause shown a later date is fixed, and requiring notice of the date for the hearing and a copy of the complaint to be served upon the corporation and upon the person whose purported election or appointment is questioned and upon any person (other than the plaintiff) whom the plaintiff alleges to have been elected or appointed, in the manner in which a summons is required to be served, or, if the court so directs, by registered mail; and the court may make such further requirements as to notice as appear to be proper under the circumstances.

(c) The court, consistent with the provisions of this part and in conformity with the articles and bylaws to the extent feasible, may determine the person entitled to the office of director or may order a new election to be held or appointment to be made, may determine the validity of the issuance of memberships and the right of persons to vote and may direct such other relief as may be just and proper.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

9419.

In the absence of fraud, any election, appointment or removal of a director is conclusively presumed valid nine months thereafter if the only defect in the election, appointment or removal is the failure to give notice as provided in this part or in the corporation’s articles or bylaws.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

9420.

Any action required or permitted to be taken by the members may be taken without a meeting, if all members shall individually or collectively consent in writing to the action. The written consent or consents shall be filed with the minutes of the proceedings of the members. The action by written consent shall have the same force and effect as the unanimous vote of the members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 587, Sec. 54.)
-------------------------------------------

9421.

(a) If the name signed on a ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment corresponds to the name of a member, the corporation if acting in good faith is entitled to accept the ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment and give it effect as the act of the member.

(b) If the name signed on a ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment does not correspond to the record name of a member, the corporation if acting in good faith is nevertheless entitled to accept the ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment and give it effect as the act of the member if any of the following occur:

(1) The member is an entity and the name signed purports to be that of an officer or agent of the entity.

(2) The name signed purports to be that of an attorney-in-fact of the member and if the corporation requests, evidence acceptable to the corporation of the signatory’s authority to sign for the member has been presented with respect to the ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment.

(3) Two or more persons hold the membership as cotenants or fiduciaries and the name signed purports to be the name of at least one of the coholders and the person signing appears to be acting on behalf of all the coholders.

(c) The corporation is entitled to reject a ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment if the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes, acting in good faith, has a reasonable basis for doubt concerning the validity of the signature or the signatory’s authority to sign for the member.

(d) The corporation and any officer or agent thereof who accepts or rejects a ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment in good faith and in accordance with the standards of this section shall not be liable in damages to the member for the consequences of the acceptance or rejection.

(e) Corporate action based on the acceptance or rejection of a ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment under this section is valid unless a court of competent jurisdiction determines otherwise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 589, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Records, Reports and Rights of Inspection [9510. - 9514.]

9510.

(a) Each corporation shall keep:

(1) Adequate and correct books and records of account.

(2) Minutes of the proceedings of its members, board and committees of the board.

(3) A record of its members giving their names and addresses and the class of membership held by each.
